Indiana, session 2026, HB1122.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
1 SECTION 1. IC 9-18.5-3-2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
2 AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
3 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. A special license plate may be issued to a former
4 member of the general assembly who served not less than the
5 following:
6 (1) For a former member of the house of representatives, not
7 less than five (5) terms.
8 (2) For a former member of the senate, not less than three (3)
9 terms.
10 (3) If an individual was a member of both the house of
11 representatives and the senate, for a total of not less than
12 twelve (12) years.
EH 1122—LS 6231/DI 137

2
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Roads and Transportation, to
which was referred House Bill 1122, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the House with
the recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Page 1, line 7, delete "six (6)" and insert "five (5)".
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1122 as introduced.)
PRESSEL
Committee Vote: yeas 11, nays 1.
_____
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Homeland Security and
Transportation, to which was referred House Bill No. 1122, has had the
same under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
Senate with the recommendation that said bill DO PASS.
(Reference is to HB 1122 as printed January 27, 2026.)
CRIDER, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 7, Nays 1
EH 1122—LS 6231/DI 137